Indiana, session 2026, SB51.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 12-15-5-6.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 6.5. The following shall ensure that a woman who has
given birth and is either a Medicaid recipient or eligible for
Medicaid schedules a follow-up appointment with a health care
provider for a postpartum checkup that is not later than sixty (60)
days from the date the woman gives birth:
(1) A hospital that is licensed under IC 16-21 and operates a
maternity unit.
(2) A health care provider that provided prenatal or delivery
care to the woman.
(3) The office or a managed care organization that has
contracted with the office under this article.
2026 IN 51—LS 6087/DI 104